Idaho statutes. Title 27 CEMETERIES AND CREMATORIUMS
Chapter 1 CEMETERY MAINTENANCE DISTRICT LAW
§ 27-122. Indebtedness prohibited — Exception.

The cemetery maintenance board or other officers of the district, shall have no power to incur any debt or liability whatever, either by issuing bonds or otherwise, in excess of the express provisions of this chapter; and any debt or liability incurred in excess of such provisions shall be and remain absolutely void. However, the board of any district shall have authority to incur indebtedness for the sole purpose of purchasing burial ground, which indebtedness shall not exceed a term of ten (10) years.

History.

1927, ch. 197, § 20, p. 264; I.C.A.,§ 27-121; I.C.,§ 28-122 (1948 Ed.); am. 1965, ch. 110, § 1, p. 216; am. 1977, ch. 115, § 2, p. 247.

§ 27-123. Duties of treasurer of cemetery maintenance district.

It is hereby made the duty of the treasurer of the cemetery maintenance district to keep account with such district; to place to the credit of such district all moneys received by him from the collector of taxes or from any other officer charged with the collection of taxes as the proceeds of taxes levied by the cemetery maintenance board, or from any other sources, and of all other moneys belonging to such district and to pay over all moneys belonging to such district on legally drawn warrants or orders of the district officers entitled to draw the same.

History.

1927, ch. 197, § 21, p. 264; I.C.A.,§ 27-122; I.C.,§ 28-123 (1948 Ed.).

§ 27-124. Warrants — Countersigned by secretary.

The secretary shall countersign all drafts and warrants on the district treasury, and no payment of the district funds shall be made except on drafts or warrant[s] countersigned by him. He shall not countersign any such draft or warrant until he has found that the payment has been legally authorized; that the money therefor has been duly appropriated and that such appropriation has not been exhausted.

Such warrants shall be drawn by and countersigned upon the order of the president of the cemetery maintenance board, or in his absence, the other members of the board; but no drafts or warrants shall be drawn except upon the appropriation of the board, nor in excess of the moneys actually in the district treasury, except that warrants may be issued in anticipation of the collection of taxes, but not in excess of the amount of the levy therefor, nor shall any warrants be issued, nor indebtedness incurred in anticipation of such levy except as herein provided. When a warrant is presented for payment, if there is money in the treasury for the purpose, the treasurer must pay the same and write on the face thereof, “paid,” the date of payment, and sign his name thereto.

History.

1927, ch. 197, § 22, p. 264; I.C.A.,§ 27-123; I.C.,§ 28-124 (1948 Ed.).

§ 27-125. Adoption of budget — Hearing.

A board shall adopt a budget and any board with a proposed budget in excess of thirty-five hundred dollars ($3,500) shall cause a public hearing to be held upon such budget prior to certifying a tax levy to the board of county commissioners pursuant to the requirements of section 63-802A, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 27-125, as added by 1973, ch. 85, § 1, p. 135; am. 1974, ch. 43, § 1, p. 1082; am. 2018, ch. 196, § 4, p. 440.

§ 27-126. Notice of hearing — Publication — Contents.

Notice of the budget hearing meetings shall be posted at least ten (10) full days prior to the date of said meeting in at least one (1) conspicuous place in each cemetery maintenance district to be determined by the board. A copy of such notice shall also be published in a daily or weekly newspaper published within such cemetery maintenance district, in one (1) issue thereof, during such ten (10) day period. The place, hour and day of such hearing shall be specified in said notice, as well as the place where such budget may be examined prior to such hearing. A full and complete copy of such proposed budget shall be published with and as a part of the publication of such notice of hearing and on the district’s official website if one exists. All hearings of the district shall be open to the public and shall permit all persons an opportunity to present oral and written testimony within reasonable time limits.

History.

I.C.,§ 27-126, as added by 1973, ch. 85, § 2, p. 135; am. 2018, ch. 196, § 5, p. 440.

§ 27-127. Public inspection.

Such budget shall be available for public inspection from and after the date of the posting of notices of hearing as in this act provided, at such place and during such business hours as the board may direct.

History.

I.C.,§ 27-127, as added by 1973, ch. 85, § 3, p. 135.

§ 27-128. Quorum.

A quorum of the board shall attend such hearing and explain the proposed budget and hear any and all objections thereto.

History.

I.C.,§ 27-128, as added by 1973, ch. 85, § 4, p. 135.

§ 27-129. Consolidation of district — Election.

Any cemetery maintenance district may consolidate with one (1) or more existing cemetery maintenance districts, provided that at least one (1) district in the proposed consolidation contains less than one hundred fifty (150) registered electors when consolidation is proposed, and that none of the districts are farther than ten (10) miles apart from any other district in the proposed consolidation. Such a consolidation is only permitted subject to the following procedure and with the following effects:

If, the board of any cemetery maintenance district determines that consolidation with one (1) or more other existing cemetery maintenance districts would be to the advantage of the district, the board will cause to be prepared an agreement for consolidation that will provide:

The name of the proposed consolidated cemetery district;

That all property of the districts to be consolidated will become the property of the consolidated district;

That all debts of the districts to be consolidated shall become the debts of the consolidated district;

That the existing commissioners of the districts to be consolidated shall be the commissioners of the consolidated district until the next election, said election to be held pursuant to the terms of section 27-111, Idaho Code, at which three (3) commissioners shall be elected, unless the agreement of consolidation establishes a five (5) member board, in which case five (5) commissioners shall be elected. If the board consists of three (3) members, commissioners from cemetery subdistricts one (1) and two (2) shall be elected for terms of four (4) years, and the commissioner from cemetery subdistrict three (3) shall be elected for a term of two (2) years. If the board consists of five (5) commissioners, the commissioners from cemetery subdistricts one (1), three (3) and five (5) shall be elected for terms of four (4) years, and the commissioners from cemetery subdistricts two (2) and four (4) shall be elected for an initial term of two (2) years. Thereafter, the term of all commissioners shall be four (4) years; and

At least one (1) public hearing shall be held by the boards of cemetery district commissioners prior to the election.

After approval of the agreement by each of the cemetery maintenance district boards, such consolidation must then be presented to the electors of the cemetery districts for ratification in order to take effect. An election ratifying an agreement consolidating cemetery maintenance districts must be held in an even-numbered year on the dates provided in section 34-106(1)(a) and (b), Idaho Code. The board of each district involved in the proposed consolidation must approve the agreement at least eighty (80) days before such an election and the county clerk where each district is located must be notified of the agreement of consolidation at least eighty (80) days before such an election.

The county clerk will provide personal notice of the election by mail to each elector of the district and notice of whether a levy rate would increase as a consequence of the proposed consolidation, detailing the levy rate that would be adopted by consolidation. The election will otherwise be conducted as provided in section 27-106, Idaho Code, except that the question will be “Consolidation of .... cemetery districts, yes,” or “Consolidation of .... cemetery districts, no,” or words equivalent thereto. If more than one-half (½) of the votes cast for each of the affected districts are yes, the agreement will become effective. If more than one-half (½) of the votes cast in either of the affected districts are no, the agreement will be void and of no effect.

Upon the agreement of consolidation becoming effective, the board of the consolidated cemetery district will file a certified copy of the agreement with the county recorder and comply with the provisions of section 63-215, Idaho Code. The consolidated district will thereafter have the same rights and obligations as any other district organized under the statutes of this state.

When the agreement of consolidation is filed with the county recorder, the county commissioners will divide the cemetery maintenance district into as many subdistricts as are provided in the agreement of consolidation. The subdistricts will be as nearly equal in population, area and mileage as practicable. The subdistricts will be used in the next election following consolidation and in elections thereafter as provided in subsection (1)(d) of this section and section 27-111, Idaho Code.

An agreement of consolidation will not take effect unless such consolidation complies with the provisions of section 27-121(2), Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 27-129, as added by 2018, ch. 196, § 6, p. 440.